North Carolina, session 2025, SB58.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 114-2.8, as enacted by Section 3D.1 of S.L. 2024-57, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 114-2.8. Limitation on participation in foreign certain litigation.
(a) The Attorney General shall not, as a party, amicus, or any other participant in an
action pending before a state or federal court in another state, advance any argument that would
result in the invalidation of any statute enacted by the General Assembly.
(b) The Attorney General shall not, as a party, amicus, or any other participant, do either
of the following in any state or federal court:
(1) File an action that would result in the invalidation of an executive order issued
by the President of the United States.
(2) Advance any argument in a pending action that would result in the
invalidation of any executive order issued by the President of the United
States."
SECTION 2. No later than June 1, 2025, the Attorney General shall submit a report
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety containing the
following information to the extent the information is available:
(1) How many convictions for violations of G.S. 14-277 have been obtained from
January 1, 2021 through March 1, 2025.
(2) How many convictions for violations of G.S. 14-277 obtained from January
1, 2021 through March 1, 2025 were based on the defendant's impersonation
of an agent of the Immigration and Customs Enforcement of the United States
Department of Homeland Security.
The Attorney General shall request the required information and coordinate the
required response by requesting information from all necessary parties, including but not limited
to the North Carolina Administrative Office of the Courts, the North Carolina Conference of
District Attorneys, and any elected district attorney.
SECTION 3. Section 1 is effective when it becomes law and applies to actions filed
or commenced on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
*S58-v-3*